src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!= @CODE@
nuoret:nuore n_12_pl ;
sukujuuret:suku#juure n_12_pl ;
sisäpillunhuulet:sisäpillun#huule n_12_pl ;
ulkopillunhuulet:ulkopillun#huule n_12_pl ;
aterii:ateri n_31_ii ;
epidemii:epidemi n_31_ii ;
hierarkii:hierarki n_31_ii ;
topograafii:topograafi n_31_ii ;
paikalishistoorii:paikalis#histoori n_31_ii ;
pandemii:pandemi n_31_ii ;
raasabiologii:raasa#biologi n_31_ii ;
asia:asia n_31_asia ;
pääasia:pää#asia n_31_asia ;
pulettii:puletti n_31_ii ;
hurraa:hurraa n_31_lainasana_ee ;
idee:idee n_31_lainasana_ee ;
kulttuurikomitee:kulttuuri#komitee n_31_lainasana_ee ;
redaksuunikomitee:redaksuuni#komitee n_31_lainasana_ee ;
komitee:komitee n_31_lainasana_ee ;
orkidee:orkidee n_31_lainasana_ee ;
filee:filee n_31_lainasana_ee ;
bidee:bidee n_31_lainasana_ee ;
buffee:buffee n_31_lainasana_ee ;
gelee:gelee n_31_lainasana_ee ;
teevee:teevee n_31_lainasana_ee ;
riihi:riihe n_12_hi ;
ryssänlohi:ryssän#lohe n_12_hi ;
syyslohi:syys#lohe n_12_hi ;
villilohi:villi#lohe n_12_hi ;
isolohi:iso#lohe n_12_hi ;
lohi:lohe n_12_hi ;
tuohi:tuohe n_12_hi ;
kuuroinkieli:kuuroin#kiele n_12 ;
perimäkieli:perimä#kiele n_12 ;
selväkieli:selvä#kiele n_12 ;
lamphaankieli:lamphaan#kiele n_12 ;
meänkieli:meän#kiele n_12 ;
vähemistökieli:vähemistö#kiele n_12 ;
kieli:kiele n_12 ;
ovipieli:ovi#piele n_12 ;
hiili:hiile n_12 ;
eteläpuoli:etelä#puole n_12 ;
vestapuoli:vesta#puole n_12 ;
aamupuoli:aamu#puole n_12 ;
savipuoli:savi#puole n_12 ;
pohjaispuoli:pohjais#puole n_12 ;
umpusuoli:umpu#suole n_12 ;
paksusuoli:paksu#suoli n_12 ;
alahuuli:ala#huule n_12 ;
vastatuuli:vasta#tuule n_12 ;
tuuli:tuule n_12 ;
verisuoni:veri#suone n_12 ;
horrosuni:horros#une n_12 ;
uni:une n_12 ;
muisteliijaääni:muisteliija#ääne n_12 ;
kaari:kaare n_12 ;
mangruuvisaari:mangruuvi#saare n_12 ;
jäämeri:jää#mere n_12 ;
tienvieri:tien#viere n_12 ;
kiikkuhiiri:kiikku#hiire n_12 ;
preivikuori:preivi#kuore n_12 ;
keltajuuri:kelta#juure n_12 ;
suolalohi:suola#lohe n_12_hi ;
taraslohi:taras#lohe n_12_hi ;
savvulohi:savvu#lohe n_12_hi ;
antropologii:antropologi n_31_ii ;
kraniologii:kraniologi n_31_ii ;
melodii:melodi n_31_ii ;
arkeologii:arkeologi n_31_ii ;
terminologii:terminologi n_31_ii ;
jouttikarhii:joutti#karhi n_31_ii ;
kalansikkii:kalan#sikki n_31_ii ;
raappii:raappi n_31_ii ;
kurkkii:kurkki n_31_ii ;
rannii:ranni n_31_ii ;
haravanpii:haravan#pi n_31_ii ;
teorii:teori n_31_ii ;
geometrii:geometri n_31_ii ;
sellerii+Dial/Por:selleri n_31_ii ;
pääassii:pää#assi n_31_ii ;
assii:assi n_31_ii ;
koheessii:koheessi n_31_ii ;
keittoastii:keitto#asti n_31_ii ;
hietalaattii:hieta#laatti n_31_ii ;
kalttii:kaltti n_31_ii ;
kiviauttii:kivi#autti n_31_ii ;
rauttii:rautti n_31_ii ;
vuori:vuore n_12  ;
ahkio:ahkio n_31_io ;
kaltio:kaltio n_31_io ;
palkkio:palkkio n_31_io ;
kurkkio:kurkkio n_31_io ;
kaltio:kaltio n_31_io ;
rautio:rautio n_31_io ;
allio:allio n_31_io ;
ansio:ansio n_31_io ;
karikallio:kari#kallio n_31_io ;
kallio:kallio n_31_io ;
tuomio:tuomio n_31_io ;
huomio:huomio n_31_io ;
vainio:vainio n_31_io ;
raunio:raunio n_31_io ;
vuopio:vuopio n_31_io ;
territorio:territorio n_31_io ;
anssio:anssio n_31_io ;
saameraadio:saame#raadio n_31_io ;
raatio:raatio n_31_io ;
suosio:suosio n_31_io ;
fotostuudio:foto#stuudio n_31_io ;
musikkistudio:musikki#studio n_31_io ;
puhetstudio:puhet#studio n_31_io ;
studio:studio n_31_io ;
tappio:tappio n_31_io ;
tolpio:tolpio n_31_io ;
valtio:valtio n_31_io ;
nuotio:nuotio n_31_io ;
kavio:kavio n_31_io ;
rovio:rovio n_31_io ;
platoo:platoo n_31_lainasana_ee ;
samppoo:samppoo n_31_lainasana_ee ;
samppoo+Err/Orth:šamppoo n_31_lainasana_ee ;
hyvittelyvastuu:hyvittely#vastuu n_31_uu ;
vastuu:vastuu n_31_uu ;
jääkarfuu:jää#karfuu n_31_uu ;
karfuu:karfuu n_31_uu ;
jääkarhuu:jää#karhuu n_31_uu ;
teddykarhuu:teddy#karhuu n_31_uu ;
karhuu:karhuu n_31_uu ;
rassuu:rassuu n_31_uu ;
porstuu:porstuu n_31_uu ;
lattuu:lattuu n_31_uu ;
sivakkalattuu:sivakka#lattuu n_31_uu ;
faakimiljöö:faaki#miljöö n_31_lainasana_ee ;
likimiljöö:liki#miljöö n_31_lainasana_ee ;
maanpruukimiljöö:maanpruuki#miljöö n_31_lainasana_ee ;
mettämiljöö:mettä#meiljöö n_31_lainasana_ee ;
minoriteettimiljöö:minoriteetti#miljöö n_31_lainasana_ee ;
paikalismiljöö:paikalis#miljöö n_31_lainasana_ee ;
yhtheismiljöö:yhtheis#miljöö n_31_lainasana_ee ;
miljöö:miljöö n_31_lainasana_ee ;
